Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1245] DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS PLATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must issue Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a recipient of the Distinguished Flying Cross; new text end new text begin (2) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; and new text end new text begin (4) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin (b) Application for issuance of Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates may be made only at the time of renewal or first application for registration. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may issue only one set of Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates, or a single plate in the case of a motorcycle, for each qualified applicant. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of veterans affairs, must design an emblem for the special plates that includes the Distinguished Flying Cross medal and includes the phrase "DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin No fee. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue a set of Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates to qualified applicants free of charge, and the plates must be replaced free of charge if they become damaged. No fee may be charged for a subsequent year when a motor vehicle listed in subdivision 1 upon which the Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates are placed is registered under section 168.017. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 168.12, subdivision 1, Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle upon notification to the commissioner and without payment of a fee if the subsequent motor vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), to bear the special license plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special license plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special license plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for Distinguished Flying Cross special license plates issued on or after that date. new text end